Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-812
Search warrant; issuance.

A search warrant authorized by sections 29-812 to 29-821 may be issued by any judge of the county court, district court, Court of Appeals, or Supreme Court for execution anywhere within the State of Nebraska or for service upon any publicly or privately held corporation, partnership, or other legal entity located within or outside the State of Nebraska. A similar search warrant authorized by such sections may be issued, subject to section 24-519, by any clerk magistrate within the county in which the property sought is located.

Laws 1963, c. 161, § 1, p. 570;

Laws 1973, LB 226, § 17;

Laws 1974, LB 735, § 2;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 24;

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 56;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 30;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 72;

Laws 1992, LB 1059, § 22;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 19;

Laws 2015, LB294, § 13.

Nebraska Liquor Control Act, issuance under, see section 53-1,108 et seq.

Failure of magistrate to collect fee for issuing search warrant does not invalidate it. State v. McCown, 189 Neb. 495, 203 N.W.2d 445 (1973).

On a hearing on a motion to suppress evidence, it is within the discretion of the trial court to permit withdrawal of rest and the taking of further evidence. State v. Putnam, 178 Neb. 445, 133 N.W.2d 605 (1965).